transformed_root_all_lines.lexc
OLang/SME		        !!= *, OLang/SME		        !!= *oun
OLang/SWE		        !!= *, OLang/SWE		        !!= *oun
OLang/UND		        !!= *, OLang/UND		        !!= *oun


!! ### Compounding tags

!! The tags are of the following form:
!! * **+CmpNP/xxx** - Normative (N), Position (P), ie the tag describes what
!!                    position the tagged word can be in in a compound
!! * **+CmpN/xxx**  - Normative (N) **form** ie the tag describes what
!!                    form the tagged word should use when making compounds
!! * **+Cmp/xxx**   - Descriptive compounding tags, ie tags that *describes*
!!                    what form a word actually is using in a compound

!! This entry / word should be in the following position(s):

+CmpNP/All       !!≈ * **@CODE@** - ... in all positions, **default**, this tag does not have to be written
+CmpNP/First     !!≈ * **@CODE@** - ... only be first part in a compound or alone
+CmpNP/Pref      !!≈ * **@CODE@** - ... only **first** part in a compound, NEVER alone
+CmpNP/Last      !!≈ * **@CODE@** - ... only be last part in a compound or alone
+CmpNP/Suff      !!≈ * **@CODE@** - ... only **last** part in a compound, NEVER alone
+CmpNP/None      !!≈ * **@CODE@** - ... does not take part in compounds
+CmpNP/Only      !!≈ * **@CODE@** - ... only be part of a compound, i.e. can never
                 !!                     be used alone, but can appear in any position

!!
!! If unmarked, any position goes.

!! The tagged part of the compound should make a compound using:

+CmpN/SgN      !!≈ * **@CODE@** Singular Nominative
+CmpN/SgG      !!≈ * **@CODE@** Singular Genitive
+CmpN/PlG      !!≈ * **@CODE@** Plural Genitive
+CmpN/PlN      !!≈ * **@CODE@** Plural Nominative, propers!

!! Unmarked = Default, ie `+CmpN/SgN` for SME.

!! The second part of the compound may require that the previous (left part) is:

+CmpN/SgNomLeft  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Singular Nominative
+CmpN/SgGenLeft  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Singular Genitive
+CmpN/PlGenLeft  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Plural Genitive


!! ### These tags describe the parts of the compound.

!! The prefix (before "/") is **Cmp**.

+Cmp/Hyph   !!≈ * **@CODE@** compounds where first part ends in -
+Cmp/SgNom  !!≈ * **@CODE@** compounds where first part is Sg Nom
+Cmp/PlNom  !!≈ * **@CODE@** compounds where first part is Pl Nom
+Cmp/Attr   !!≈ * **@CODE@** compounds where first part is Attr
+Cmp/SgGen  !!≈ * **@CODE@** compounds where first part is Sg Gen
+Cmp/PlGen  !!≈ * **@CODE@** compounds where first part is Pl Gen
+Cmp/SplitR !!≈ * **@CODE@** compounds where first part is a split compound hmm
+Cmp/Sh     !!≈ * **@CODE@** compounds where first part is a short form
+Cmp           !!≈ * **@CODE@** - Dynamic compound. This tag should always be part
               !!                 of a dynamic compound. It is important for
               !!                 Apertium, and useful in other cases as well.

!! ### Others
!! The boundaries of compounds that are not lexicalised in the dictionary will
!! have compound analyses, the compounds may also have usage tags. The
!! compounding analyses concern also syntagmatic melting mishmash.




+Use/Circ    !!= Compound boundary







!! The word and morpheme boundaries are used to limit the effective range of
!! far-reaching rules, such as vowel harmony. The boundaries are marked by
!! curly bracketed hashes or underscores. The word boundaries are marked by #,
!! The lexical item boundaries by ##, the inflectional morpheme boundaries
!! by >, the derivational morpheme boundaries by », and some etymological and
!! soft boundaries by _.
## !!= * `@CODE@`: Lexical boundary
!! * `#` word boundary
!! * `>` inflectional morph boundary
!! * `»` derivational morph boundary
!! * _ weak boundary

 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 #7     ! #
 _7     ! _
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <

%{hyph%?%}
%{MB%}
%>

!! ## Flag diacritics
!! We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
!! flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
!! with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@    !!≈ |  @CODE@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
 @D.NeedNoun.ON@    !!≈ |  @CODE@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
 @C.NeedNoun@       !!≈ |  @CODE@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

 @C.ErrOrth@		!!≈ |  @CODE@
 @D.ErrOrth.ON@		!!≈ |  @CODE@
 @P.ErrOrth.ON@		!!≈ |  @CODE@

!!
!! For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
!! to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
!! handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
!! do no harm.
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ !!≈ |  @CODE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
 @D.CmpPref.TRUE@  !!≈ |  @CODE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
 @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ !!≈ |  @CODE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
 @D.CmpLast.TRUE@  !!≈ |  @CODE@ | Block such words from entering R
 @D.CmpNone.TRUE@  !!≈ |  @CODE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
 @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ !!≈ |  @CODE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
 @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@  !!≈ |  @CODE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
 @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ !!≈ |  @CODE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.
!!
!! Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
!! nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
!! these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
!! given the proper use of these flags.
 @U.Cap.Obl@        !!≈ |  @CODE@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
 @U.Cap.Opt@        !!≈ |  @CODE@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.



! The root lexicon is unique entry point of this morphological description.
! This lexicon must not be used elsewhere; it contains only the markers for
! absolute start of the transducer.
LEXICON Root
!! The start of the dictionary `@LEXNAME@`
!! The Finnish morphological description starts from any of the parts of speech
!! dictionaries, prefix or hyphenated suffix
!!€gt-norm: Parts-of-speech
!!€ talo: talo+N+Sg+Nom # house
!!€ nopea: nopea+A+Sg+Nom # fast
!!€ kutoa: kutoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # to knit
0   NOUN ;  !!≈ @LEMMA@ test @CONTLEX@
0   ADJECTIVE ;
0   VERB    ;
0   NumberRoot ; ! The main lexicon
0   NUMERAL ;  !
0   DIGITS ;
0   ACRONYM ;
0   PRONOUN    ;
0   PARTICLE    ;
0   INTERJECTION ;
0   PUNCTUATION ;
0   CONJUNCTIONVERB ;
0   PREFIX      ;
0   SUFFIX      ; ! suffixes may stand stranded in co-ordination -
0   EXCEPTIONS  ;
0   CC ;
0   CS ;
0   PROPER ;
0   ABBREVIATION ; ! These are the fin-specific ones.
0   ADPOSITION ;
0   ADVERB ;
0   AUX    ;
!0   DET    ;
0   X    ;
! Punctuation ; ! Not used by FIN, which has its own, much richer and complete punctuation lexicon
Symbols     ;
Acronym-smi ; ! to be checked.
Abbreviation-smi ; ! these are the ones in generated-files.

-  PROPER ;
-  NOUN ;
